en: icing sugar, powdered sugar
bg: пудра захар
da: flormelis
de: Puderzucker, Azucar en polvo
es: Azúcar glasé
fi: tomusokeri
fr: sucre glace, sucre en poudre, sucre à glacer, sucre impalpable
hr: šećerni posip
hu: porcukor
it: zucchero a velo
nl: poedersuiker, glazuursuiker, bloemsuiker
pl: cukier puder
pt: Açúcar em pó
ru: сахарная пудра, пудра сахарная
sv: florsocker

en: vanilla sugar
bg: ванилова захар
bs: vanilin šećer
da: vaniljesukker
de: vanillezucker
es: azúcar vainillada
fi: vaniljasokeri
fr: sucre vanillé
hr: vanilin šećer
hu: vaníliás cukor
it: zucchero vanigliato
kk: ванильді қант
lt: vanilinis cukrus
nb: vaniljesukker
nl: vanillesuiker
pl: cukier waniliowy
pt: açúcar de baunilha
sv: vaniljsocker
uk: ванільний цукор

en: nib sugar, pearl sugar, sugar pearls
de: Hagelzucker, Perlzucker
fr: sucre perlé, perles de sucre
hr: sitni šećer
it: granella di zucchero
nl: parelsuiker, hagelsuiker

en: blonde sugar
es: azúcar rubio
fr: sucre blond
hr: plavi šećer
it: zucchero biondo
nl: blonde suiker

en: granulated sugar
bg: гранулирана захар, кристална захар
de: Zucker mittelgross
es: Azúcar cristalizado
fi: kidesokeri
fr: Sucre cristal
hr: šećer bijeli kristal, šećer kristal, bijeli kristal šećer
hu: kristálycukor
nl: Kristalsuiker
pt: Açúcar granulado

en: caster sugar
de: Streuzucker
fr: sucre semoule
hr: šećer u prahu
it: zucchero semolato

en: sugar cube
da: sukkerknald
de: Würfelzucker
fi: palasokeri
fr: Sucre en morceaux
hr: bijeli šećer u kocki
it: zolletta di zucchero

en: fermented sugar
it: zucchero fermentato
nl: gefermenteerde suiker

en: maple sugar
da: lønsukker
de: Ahornzucker
es: azúcar de arce
fr: sucre d'érable
hr: javorov šećer
it: zucchero d'acero
ja: メープルシュガー
sv: lönnsocker

en: sugarcane, sugar cane
am: ሸንኮራ ኣገዳ
ar: قصب السكر
as: কুঁহিয়াৰ
az: dərman şəkərqamışı
be: цукровы трыснёг
bg: захарна тръстика
bi: sugarcane
bn: আখ
bo: བུར་ཤིང་།
bs: šećerna trska
ca: saccharum
ch: tupu
cs: cukrová třtina
cy: cansen siwgr
da: sukkerrør
de: Zuckerrohr
dv: އުއްދަނޑި
el: ζαχαροκάλαμο
eo: sukerkano
es: caña de azúcar
et: suhkruroog
eu: azukre-kanabera
fa: نیشکر
fi: sokeriruoko
fj: dovu
fr: canne à sucre, cannes à sucre
ga: cána siúcra
gl: cana de azucre
gn: takuare'ẽ
gu: શેરડી
gv: cane millish
ha: rake
hi: गन्ना
hr: šećerna trska
ht: kann
hu: cukornád
id: tebu
ig: okpete
io: sukrokano
is: sykurreyr
it: canna da zucchero
ja: サトウキビ
jv: tebu
ka: შაქრის ლერწამი
kg: nkuku
kn: ಕಬ್ಬು
ko: 사탕수수
ky: бал камыш
lg: kikajjo
lt: cukranendrė
lv: cukurniedres
mg: fary
mi: tō
mk: шеќерна трска
ml: കരിമ്പ്
mn: чихрийн нишингэ
mr: ऊस
ms: tebu
my: ကြံပင်
nb: sukkerrør
ne: उखु
nl: suikerriet
nn: sukkerrøyr
nv: dáʼákaz łikaní
oc: cana de sucre
or: ଆଖୁ
pa: ਗੰਨਾ
pl: trzcina cukrowa
ps: گني
pt: cana-de-açúcar
qu: misk'i wiru
rn: isuka
ro: trestie de zahăr
ru: сахарный тростник
sh: šećerna trska
sk: cukrová trstina
sl: sladkorni trst
sn: nzimbe
so: qassab
sq: kallam Sheqeri
sr: шећерна трска
su: tiwu
sv: sockerrör
sw: muwa
ta: கரும்பு
te: చెరకు
th: อ้อย
tl: tubo
to: tō
tr: şeker kamışı
ts: xikhovha xa chukele
tw: ahwedeɛ
uk: цукрова тростина
ur: گنا
uz: shakarqamish
vi: mía
yi: צוקערראר
yo: ìrèké
za: oij
zh: 甘蔗
zu: umoba

en: sugarcane juice, cane juice
bg: сок от захарна тръстика
da: sukkerrørssaft
de: Zuckerrohrsaft
es: jugo de caña de azúcar
fr: jus de canne à sucre, jus de canne
hr: sok od šećerne trske
it: succo di canna da zucchero
nl: suikerrietsap

en: cane sugar, pure cane sugar, natural cane sugar
bg: захар от захарна тръстика, тръстикова захар
ca: Sucre de canya
cs: třtinový cukr
da: rørsukker
de: Rohrzucker
el: ζάχαρη από ζαχαροκάλαμο
es: azúcar de caña
fi: ruokosokeri
fr: sucre de canne, pur sucre de canne, sucre pure canne, sucre 100 pure canne
ga: siúcra cána
he: סוכר קנים
hr: šećer od šećerne trske, šećer šećerne trske
hu: nádcukor
it: zucchero di canna
ja: きび糖
lv: cukurniedru cukurs
mt: zokkor tal-kannamiela
nb: rørsukker
nl: rietsuiker, riet
nn: røyrsukker
pl: cukier trzcinowy
pt: açúcar de cana
ru: тростниковый сахар
sl: trsni sladkor
sr: šećer od šećerne trske, Šećerna trska
sv: rörsocker
uk: тростинний цукор

en: evaporated cane juice
de: Angedickter Zuckerrohrsaft
es: Jugo de caña evaporado
fr: jus de canne évaporé
hr: ispareni sok trske
it: succo di canna evaporato

en: cane sugar cube, cane sugar cubes
bg: кубчета тръстикова захар, тръстикова захар на кубчета
de: braune Zuckerwürfel
fi: ruokopalasokeri
fr: Sucre en morceaux pure canne
hr: kocke šećera od trske
hu: nád kockacukor
it: cubetti di zucchero di canna

en: brown cane sugar cube, brown cane sugar cubes
de: brauner Rohrzucker in Würfeln
es: azúcar moreno de caña en terrones
fr: Sucre roux de canne en morceaux
hr: kocke smeđeg šećera od trske
hu: barna nád kockacukor
it: Zollette di zucchero grezzo di canna
nl: Bruin rietsuiker in klontjes

en: organic cane sugar
da: økologisk rørsukker
de: Bio-Rohrzucker
es: caña de azúcar orgánica
fi: luomuruokosokeri, luomu ruokosokeri
fr: sucre de canne bio, sucre de canne biologique, cannes à sucre biologiques
hr: organski šećer od trske
hu: bio nádcuor
it: zucchero di cana bio
nb: økologisk rørsukker
nl: biologische rietsuiker, biologisch rietsuiker
sv: ekologisk rörsocker

en: brown cane sugar
bg: кафява тръстикова захар
cs: hnědý třtinový cukr
da: brunt rørsukker
de: Brauner Rohrzucker
es: Azúcar moreno de caña
fr: sucre de canne brun
hr: smeđi šećer od trske
hu: barna nádcukor
nl: Bruine rietsuiker
pl: brązowy cukier trzcinowy
sv: brunt rörsocker

en: white cane sugar
bg: бяла тръстикова захар
da: hvidt rørsukker
de: weisser Rohrzucker
es: azúcar de caña blanca
fi: vaalea ruokosokeri
fr: sucre de canne blanc
hr: bijeli šećer od trske
hu: fehér nádcukor
it: zucchero di canna bianco
sv: vitt rörsocker

en: blonde cane sugar
es: Azúcar de caña rubia
fr: sucre blond de canne, sucre de canne blond
hr: plavi šećer od trske
it: zucchero di canna biondo

en: white cane sugar from Brazil
da: hvidt rørsukker fra Brasilien
de: weißer Rohrzucker aus Brasilien, brasilianischer Rohrzucker
fr: sucre de canne blond du Brésil
hr: bijeli šećer od trske iz brazila
it: zucchero di canna bianco dal Brasile